Maryland, session 2025, HB0254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
23–411.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “INDIVIDUAL EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS” HAS
THE SAME MEANING AS “HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL” UNDER THE FEDERAL
MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS ASSISTANCE ACT.
(B) A PUBLIC LIBRARY MAY NOT REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL EXPERIENCING
HOMELESSNESS TO PROVIDE A CURRENT ADDRESS BEFORE ISSUING A LIBRARY
CARD TO THE INDIVIDUAL.
Article – Housing and Community Development
1–103.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “INDIVIDUAL EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS” HAS
THE SAME MEANING AS “HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL” UNDER THE FEDERAL
MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS ASSISTANCE ACT.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A PROGRAM OPERATED BY THE
DEPARTMENT THAT AWARDS GRANTS AND LOANS THAT MAY BE USED TO PROVIDE
AFFORDABLE SINGLE–FAMILY OR MULTIFAMILY HOUSING.
(C) A RECIPIENT OF AN AWARD MAY NOT REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL
EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS TO PROVIDE A CURRENT ADDRESS AS A CONDITION
OF ELIGIBILITY ON A RESIDENTIAL APPLICATION.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ARE NECESSARY
TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION.
4–2905.
(A) To be eligible for a housing assistance payment under the State Program, a
family shall:
(1) reside in the State;
(2) be on a federal housing choice voucher waiting list; and

HOUSE BILL 254 3
(3) meet low–income eligibility limits under the federal Housing Choice
Voucher Program or income requirements as determined by the public housing agency.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT OR A PUBLIC HOUSING AGENCY MAY NOT REQUIRE
AN INDIVIDUAL EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS, AS DEFINED IN § 1–103 OF THIS
ARTICLE, TO PROVIDE A CURRENT ADDRESS AS A CONDITION OF ELIGIBILITY FOR A
HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENT.
Article – Local Government
1–201.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, “INDIVIDUAL EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS” HAS
THE SAME MEANING AS “HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL” UNDER THE FEDERAL
MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS ASSISTANCE ACT.
(B) This section does not apply to:
(1) an elected official;
(2) the head of a unit of a county or municipality who reports directly to:
(i) the chief administrative officer of the county or municipality;
(ii) an elected executive; or
(iii) the governing body of the county or municipality; or
(3) the chief administrative officer of the county or municipality.
[(b)] (C) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a county
or municipality may not require an employee [to reside in the State, county, or municipality
or within a specified distance of the State, county, or municipality as a condition of
employment], AS A CONDITION OF EMPLOYMENT:
(I) TO RESIDE IN THE STATE, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY OR
WITHIN A SPECIFIED DISTANCE OF THE STATE, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY; OR
(II) IF THE EMPLOYEE IS AN INDIVIDUAL EXPERIENCING
HOMELESSNESS, TO PROVIDE A CURRENT ADDRESS.
(2) A county or municipality may require an at–will supervisory employee
to reside in the State, county, or municipality or within a specified distance of the State,
county, or municipality as a condition of employment if the at–will supervisory employee
reports directly to the head of a unit of the county or municipality.

HOUSE BILL 254
(3) Subject to subsection [(c)] (D) of this section, when making
employment, promotion, demotion, layoff, and discharge decisions, a county or municipality
may not discriminate based on an individual’s place of residence.
[(c)] (D) A county or municipality may grant a resident of the State, county, or
municipality additional points or credits in employment or promotion decisions if the points
or credits are provided in accordance with a merit system established by the county or
municipality by local law or ordinance.
[(d)] (E) An agency created under State law that provides governmental services
to more than one county or municipality may not require an employee, as a condition of
employment, to reside in the State or a county or municipality or within a specified distance
of the State, a county, or a municipality for which the agency provides governmental
services.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.